District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-4602

Embezzlement by agent, attorney, clerk, servant, or agent of a corporation

Repealed.

History

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 602(e)-(o), 29 DCR 3976

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 22-1201 to 22-1211.